Maryland, session 2025, SB0449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–408.
(a) In this section, “handgun” means a firearm:
(1) With a barrel length not exceeding 6 inches; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0449*

SENATE BILL 449
(2) That does not have a scope or an electronic device attached.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department
shall:
(i) Prescribe by regulation the means or weapons for hunting
designated wildlife; and
(ii) Set forth any restrictions relating to weapons used to hunt
designated wildlife, including the amount and size of ammunition for designated game
birds or mammals.
(2) The Department may not prohibit a licensed bow hunter from openly
carrying a handgun that the hunter is otherwise authorized to carry under § 4–203 of the
Criminal Law Article if the bow hunter:
(i) Is at least 21 years old;
(ii) Is hunting in [deer]:
1. DEER management Region A as defined by the
Department’s Guide to Hunting and Trapping; OR
2. FREDERICK COUNTY OR WASHINGTON COUNTY
DURING DEER HUNTING SEASON;
(iii) Is carrying the handgun for personal protection; and
(iv) Does not use the handgun to kill wildlife wounded by a vertical
bow or crossbow.
(c) The Department shall make the regulations available for distribution with
each hunting license purchased.
(d) This section does not authorize the Department to restrict the use of firearms
except in the activity of hunting designated wildlife.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.